Utah statutes.
78B-1-201.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Appointing authority" means the presiding officer or similar official of any court, board, commission, authority, department, agency, legislative body, or of any proceeding of any nature where a qualified interpreter is required under this part.

(2)  "Hearing-impaired person" and "hearing-impaired parent" means a deaf or hard of hearing person who, because of sensory or environmental conditions, requires the assistance of a qualified interpreter or other special assistance for communicative purposes.

(3)  "Necessary steps" or "necessary services" include provisions of qualified interpreters, lip reading, pen and paper, typewriters, closed-circuit television with closed-caption translations, computers with print-out capability, and telecommunications devices for the deaf or similar devices.

(4)  "Qualified interpreter" means a sign language or oral interpreter as provided in Sections 78B-1-203 and 78B-1-206 of this part.

